District of Columbia statutes.
47-4626

Randall School development project tax exemption.

The real property described as Lot 801, Square 643S, known as the Randall School development project, owned by the Trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art, a nonprofit corporation, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title, beginning October 1, 2008, and for so long as the Trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art own the real property; provided, that the exemption shall cease once a certificate of occupancy issues for any part of the Randall School development project. The exemption shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Randall School development project.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7171(b), 57 DCR 181
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 131, 59 DCR 6190

Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-294 provided:

“Sec. 2. (a) Notwithstanding the requirements and the conditions established in the Randall School Sale Approval Resolution of 2004, effective December 21, 2004 (Res. 15-818; 52 DCR 250), the Council authorizes the Mayor to amend the declaration of covenants recorded as Instrument No. 2006160472, against Lot 0801, Square 0643-S (’Property’); provided, that the amendment contains the following terms and conditions:

“(1) The Property shall be developed into a mixed-use development that will include no less than 25,000 square feet comprised of either a nonprofit art museum or a nonprofit art gallery, or both, and that may also include residential, hotel, art uses, retail, commercial, and other ancillary uses;

“(2) The developer of the Property (’Developer’) shall enter into an agreement with the Department of Small and Local Business Development to comply with the requirements of the Small, Local, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.);

“(3) The Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement with the District of Columbia establishing that the purchaser or any developer of the property must comply with the First Source Employment Agreement Act of 1984, effective June 29, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-93; D.C. Official Code § 2-219.03), and Mayor’s Order 83-265 (November 9, 1983), regarding job creation and employment generated as a result of construction on the property;

“(4) Twenty percent of all residential units developed on the Property shall be sold or rented exclusively to households with incomes less than, or equal to, 80% of the area median income;

“(5) The first phase of development on the Property shall include 125,000 square feet of development; of the 125,000 square feet developed on the property, no less than 25,000 square feet shall comprise either a nonprofit art museum or a nonprofit art gallery, or both;

“(6) If the Developer disposes of all or any part of the Property prior to commencement of construction on the first phase of the development of the Property, the District shall be entitled to receive 40% of the profit realized from the disposition; and

“(7) The District shall have the right to reacquire the Property with any improvements if the Developer does not commence construction on the first phase of the development of the Property by January 1, 2018.

“(b) Notwithstanding the requirements and conditions established in the Randall School Sale Approval Resolution of 2004, effective December 21, 2004 (Res. 15-818; 52 DCR 250), the Council authorizes the Mayor to convey certain access easements over former Half Street, S.W., currently known for purposes of taxation and assessment as a portion of Lot 813, Square 0644, to the Trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art, its successors, and assigns, to enable the development of Lot 0801, Square 0643-S.”

Short title: Section 7170 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle O of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Randall School Development Project Tax Relief Act of 2009”.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Randall School Disposition Restatement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-2, February 2, 2011, 58 DCR 1238).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Randall School Disposition Restatement Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-540, October 5, 2010, 57 DCR 9612).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7171(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 7171(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Randall School Development Project Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-23, February 25, 2009, 56 DCR 1954).
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 18-6 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 18-6 added a section to read as follows: “§ 47-4620. Randall School development project tax exemption. The real property described as Lot 801, Square 643S, known as the Randall School development project, owned by the Trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art, a nonprofit corporation, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title, beginning October 1, 2008, and for so long as the Trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art own the real property; provided, that the exemption shall cease once a certificate of occupancy issues for any part of the Randall School development project. The exemption shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Randall School development project.”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.